src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
# Kildin Sámi TWOLC file

## Symbol declarations
### Alphabet

*   а А ӓ Ӓ а̄ А̄ б Б в В г Г д Д   
*   е Е ё Ё е̄ Е̄ ё̄ Ё̄ ж Ж з З һ Һ  
*   и И ӣ Ӣ й Й ҋ Ҋ ј Ј к К л Л  
*   ӆ Ӆ м М ӎ Ӎ н Н ӊ Ӊ ӈ Ӈ о О  
*   о̄ О̄ п П р Р ҏ Ҏ с С т Т у У  
*   ӯ Ӯ ф Ф х Х ц Ц ч Ч ш Ш щ Щ  
*   ъ Ъ ы Ы ь Ь ъ Ъ ҍ Ҍ э Э ӭ Ӭ  
*   э̄ Э̄ ю Ю ю̄ Ю̄ я Я я̄ Я̄          

### Trigger symbols
*   %^1VOW:0		 Vow trigger for epenthetic -э-
*   %^2VOW:0		 Vow trigger 
*   %^3VOW:0		 Vow trigger 
*   %^4VOW:0		 Vow trigger 
*   %^5VOW:0		 Vow trigger 
*   %^VOWSH:0              
*   %^WG:0		 for weak consonant stem gradation 
*   %^EPHV:0          
*   %^DI:0              
*   %^CLPAL:0     
*   %^CLDPAL:0	 for depalatalizing consonant stems
*   %^DPAL:0		 for depalatalizing consonant stems
*   %^MON:0    
*   %^PAL:0		 for palatalizing consonsant stems

## Sets
*  C  = б Б в В г Г д Д ж Ж з З һ Һ й Й ҋ Ҋ ј Ј к К л Л ӆ Ӆ м М ӎ Ӎ н Н ӊ Ӊ ӈ Ӈ п П р Р ҏ Ҏ с С т Т ф Ф х Х ц Ц ч Ч ш Ш щ Щ ;  
*  V  = а А ӓ Ӓ а̄ А̄ е Е е̄ Е̄ ё Ё ё̄ Ё̄ и И ӣ Ӣ о О о̄ О̄ у У ӯ Ӯ ы Ы э Э ӭ Ӭ э̄ Э̄ ю Ю ю̄ Ю̄ я Я я̄ Я̄ ;  
*  PALMARK = ь Ь ҍ Ҍ ;  
*  VPLOS = г Г ;  
*  VLPLOS = к К ;  
*  PALCON = ж Ж й Й ҋ Ҋ ј Ј ч Ч ;   can only by followed by PALVOW !so-called "palatalized C"
*  PALVOW = е Е е̄ Е̄ ё Ё ё̄ Ё̄ и И ӣ Ӣ ю Ю ю̄ Ю̄ я Я я̄ Я̄ ;  so-called "palatalized V"
*  HPLVOW = ӓ Ӓ ӭ Ӭ ;   so-called "half-palatalized V"
*  NPLVOW = а А а̄ А̄ о О о̄ О̄ у У ӯ Ӯ ы Ы э Э э̄ Э̄ ;   so-called "non-palatalized V"

*  Dummy  = %^WG %^DI %^DPAL %^MON %> %^PAL %^CLPAL ;  

# Rule section

**Quantitative CG xxy:xy (of nonpal cлusters)**  e.g. са̄ррн:са̄рн, ко̄ллм:ко̄лм, сыййт:сыйт, etc. 

**Qualitative CG xx:y (of voiced affricates)      ** i.e. джь : жь, дзь : зь, дз : з

**Quantitative CG (of continuants)**  

**ue>ua Ablaut**  

**Epenthetic vowel deletion (npal vowels)** e.g. ко̄рэб:ко̄рбэсьт, etc. шоабаш-:шоабш-

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sjd/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
